Hawaii statutes.
§185-5 Rates of pay for firefighting.
Persons summoned by the administrator or a manager or by anyone authorized by
the administrator or a manager for controlling or extinguishing a fire, within
the meaning of this chapter, and who are eligible for compensation under this
chapter, shall receive compensation at an hourly rate equivalent to the
prevailing entry level rate of the civil service classification for the skill
for which the person is called on to perform. The rental rates of equipment
shall not exceed the prevailing interdepartmental rates for equipment of
similar type as established by the department of accounting and general
services and supplies or material expended shall be paid for at the actual cost
of replacement. [L 1953, c 100, §7; RL 1955, §19-55; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12;
HRS §185-5; am L 1974, c 64, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 140, §6]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next